Hawaii, session 2026, HB1278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the department of land and natural resources' division of forestry and wildlife oversees nearly one million acres of public land across the State, including forest areas that abut residential property.  According to the 2023 State of Hawaii hazard mitigation plan, windstorm events alone significantly contributed to downed trees, which caused power outages, road closures, significant traffic delays, serious injuries, and several hundred thousand dollars' worth of damage to crops and property across the State between January 2018 and December 2021.  Furthermore, the hazard mitigation plan asserts that natural habitats, such as forests, are some of the most vulnerable to damage from natural weather events. The legislature further finds that state-owned forests adjacent to residential areas must be maintained to protect the health and safety of communities from the possibility of downed trees during storms, wildfires, high winds, or other natural events, because fallen trees and branches from inadequately managed forest areas can cause severe damage to homes, vehicles, and critical infrastructure and endangers the lives of residents and first responders.  Effective monitoring and management of state forests abutting residential areas, including routine assessments and removal of dangerous tress, are necessary functions of the division of forestry and wildlife. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the department of land and natural resources' division of forestry and wildlife for the assessment and removal of hazardous trees on state lands. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $165,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the division of forestry and wildlife of the department of land and natural resources to assess and remove hazardous trees on state lands across Hawaii; provided that the sum shall be allocated as follows: (1)  $15,000 for Kauai; (2)  $25,000 for Oahu; (3)  $50,000 for Maui; and (4)  $75,000 for Hawaii island. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________